Maryland, session 2025, SB0962.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
16–305.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, each county, municipality,
and special taxing district created by the State shall have its financial records audited at
least once each fiscal year by the persons and for the purposes specified in this section and
§§ 16–307 and 16–308 of this subtitle.
(b) (1) Unless the Legislative Auditor determines, on a case–by–case basis,
that more frequent audits are required, the Legislative Auditor may authorize a
municipality or a special taxing district created by the State with annual revenues of less
than $250,000 in the prior 4 fiscal years to have an audit conducted once every 4 years.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, A MUNICIPALITY IS
EXEMPT FROM THE AUDIT REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
FOR ANY FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH THE MUNICIPAL ANNUAL REVENUES ARE LESS
THAN $100,000.
(c) (1) The audit required under subsection (a) of this section shall be
conducted by a certified public accountant:
– 1 –

Ch. 727 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) acting in the capacity of an independent auditor or an official
auditor of a county or municipality; and
(ii) who is in compliance with the Maryland Public Accountancy Act.
(2) An official auditor must be approved by the Legislative Auditor to
conduct the audit.
(3) In conducting the audit, the auditor shall examine the methods,
accuracy, and legality of the financial records of the county, municipality, or special taxing
district.
(d) (1) On the initiative of the Legislative Auditor, the Legislative Auditor may
review or audit the financial records of any county, municipality, or special taxing district
created by the State.
(2) A county, municipality, or special taxing district created by the State
may request the Legislative Auditor to audit its financial records.
(E) (1) AN AUDIT EXEMPTION FOR A MUNICIPALITY UNDER SUBSECTION
(B)(2) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT AFFECT THE REQUIREMENT OF THAT
MUNICIPALITY TO FILE WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF LEGISLATIVE SERVICES A
FINANCIAL REPORT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 16–304 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) IF THE FINANCIAL REPORT SUBMITTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
16–304 OF THIS SUBTITLE BY A MUNICIPALITY THAT HAS AN AUDIT EXEMPTION
UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION INDICATES A FINANCIAL OR
ACCOUNTING IRREGULARITY OR CONCERN, THE JOINT AUDIT AND EVALUATION
COMMITTEE MAY REQUEST OR REQUIRE A REVIEW OR AUDIT OF THE FINANCIAL
RECORDS OF THAT MUNICIPALITY THE MUNICIPALITY TO CONDUCT A REVIEW OR
AUDIT OF ITS FINANCIAL RECORDS CONSISTENT WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –